Hawaii statutes.
[§523A-54] Request by director of finance
for report of previously unreported information. On the thirtieth day of
June of each year, the director shall request the Comptroller General or other
proper officer of the United States to report all previously unreported
information relating to unclaimed property as determined by that officer
pursuant to federal law. [L 1988, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next